Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.310

Biennial report—Contents—Format.

(1) Subject to RCW 40.07.040, the disciplinary [disciplining] authority shall submit a biennial report to the legislature on its proceedings during the biennium, detailing the number of complaints made, investigated, and adjudicated and manner of disposition. In addition, the report must provide data on the department's background check activities conducted under RCW 18.130.064 and the effectiveness of those activities in identifying potential license holders who may not be qualified to practice safely. The report must summarize the distribution of the number of cases assigned to each attorney and investigator for each profession. The identity of the attorney and investigator must remain anonymous. The report may include recommendations for improving the disciplinary process, including proposed legislation. The department shall develop a uniform report format.

(2) Each disciplining authority identified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b) may submit a biennial report to complement the report required under subsection (1) of this section. Each report may provide additional information about the disciplinary activities, rule-making and policy activities, and receipts and expenditures for the individual disciplining authority.

[ 2009 c 518 s 22; 2008 c 134 s 13; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 313; 1987 c 505 s 5; 1984 c 279 s 23.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.